Idaho, session 2026, H0715.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 33-2607, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
33-2607. POWERS AND DUTIES OF TRUSTEES. In addition to the powers
elsewhere contained in this chapter and notwithstanding the provisions of
title 50, Idaho Code, the board of trustees of each city library shall have
the following powers and duties:
(1) To establish bylaws for its own governance;
(2) To establish policies and rules of use for the governance of the li-
brary or libraries under its control; to exclude from the use of the library
any and all persons who violate such rules;
(3) To establish, locate, maintain, and have custody of libraries to
serve the city, and to provide suitable rooms, structures, facilities, fur-
niture, apparatus, and appliances necessary for library service;
(4) With the approval of the city:
(a) To acquire real property by purchase, gift, devise, lease, or oth-
erwise;
(b) To own and hold real and personal property and to construct build-
ings for the use and purposes of the library;
(c) To sell, exchange, or otherwise dispose of real or personal prop-
erty when no longer required by the library; and
(d) To insure the real and personal property of the library;
(5) To prepare and adopt a budget for review and approval by the city
council;
(6) To control the expenditures of money budgeted for the library;
(7) To accept or decline gifts of money or personal property, in accor-
dance with library policy, and under such terms as may be a condition of the
gift;
(8) To hire, supervise and evaluate the library director supervise and
evaluate the library director and, with the approval of a majority of the
members of the city council, to hire and terminate the library director;
(9) To establish policies for the purchase and distribution of library
materials;
(10) To attend all meetings of the board of trustees;
(11) To maintain legal records of all board business;


(12) To exercise such other powers, not inconsistent with law, neces-
sary for the orderly and efficient management of the library.
SECTION 2. That Section 33-2608, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
33-2608. LIBRARY DIRECTOR -- DUTIES -- OTHER EMPLOYEES. (1) The board
of trustees of each city library shall appoint the library director, who
shall serve at the pleasure of the board. with the approval of a majority of
the members of the city council. The board may terminate the library direc-
tor with the approval of a majority of the members of the city council. The
library director shall advise the board, implement policy set by the board,
supervise all library staff, and shall acquire library materials, equip-
ment, and supplies. The library director shall attend all board meetings but
shall not vote.
(2) With the recommendation of the library director, the board shall
budget to hire other employees as may be necessary for the operation of the
library. The library director shall hire or oversee the hiring of all other
employees based on the policies, procedures, and job descriptions of the
city. These employees shall be employees of the city and subject to the
city's personnel policies and classifications unless otherwise provided by
city ordinance.
SECTION 3. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.